Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.087

Economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff—Caseload forecast supervisor and staff—Exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply to the economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff employed under RCW 82.33.010 or the caseload forecast supervisor and staff employed under RCW 43.88C.010.

[ 1997 c 168 s 4; 1990 c 229 s 3; 1984 c 138 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 168: See RCW 43.88C.900.

Effective date—1990 c 229: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1990." [ 1990 c 229 s 12.]